Louisiana, session 2026, SB244.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 56:256 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§256. Recreational alligator harvest; penalties
A. Notwithstanding the provisions of R.S. 56:8(92), which defines
alligators as nongame quadrupeds, the commission may establish a special
recreational alligator season, independent of the traditional commercial
alligator season set pursuant to this Subpart.
B. The commission may establish the season for the recreational taking
or possession of alligators by area within the state. The commission may also
establish harvest quotas or tag allotments per area of the state. The commission
may extend, curtail, or prohibit the recreational take of alligators in any area
of the state.
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 244 ENROLLED
C. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the commission
may prescribe residency requirements, recreational methods of taking alligators
and hours within which alligators may be taken, and may except recreationally-
harvested alligators from the requirements of R.S. 56:253.
D. Any person taking an alligator recreationally shall possess a valid
basic hunting license, a valid alligator hunting license, and recreational harvest
tags issued by the department.
E. Recreational taking of alligators under any of the following
circumstances is prohibited:
(1) Taking outside of the special season, as designated by the commission.
(2) Taking by a person who is without valid licenses or tags.
(3) Taking by illegal methods.
F. Violation of this Section constitutes a class three violation.
Section 2. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.